California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Any employee of a county child or adult protective services agency, while acting in his or her professional capacity or within the scope of his or her employment, who has knowledge of or observes an animal whom he or she knows or reasonably suspects has been the victim of cruelty, abuse, or neglect, may report the known or reasonably suspected animal cruelty, abuse, or neglect to the entity or entities that investigate reports of animal cruelty, abuse, and neglect in that county.

(b) The report may be made within two working days of receiving the information concerning the animal by facsimile transmission of a written report presented in the form described in subdivision (e) or by telephone if all of the information that is required to be provided pursuant to subdivision (e) is furnished. In cases where an immediate response may be necessary in order to protect the health and safety of the animal or others, the report may be made by telephone as soon as possible.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose a duty to investigate known or reasonably suspected animal cruelty, abuse, or neglect.

(d) As used in this section, the terms “animal,” “cruelty,” “abuse,” “neglect,” “reasonable suspicion,” and “owner” are defined as follows:

(1) “Animal” includes every dumb
 creature.

(2) “Cruelty,” “abuse,” and “neglect” include every act, omission, or neglect whereby unnecessary or unjustifiable physical pain or suffering is caused or permitted.

(3) “Reasonable suspicion” means that it is objectively reasonable for a person to entertain a suspicion, based upon facts that could cause a reasonable person in a like position, drawing, when appropriate, on his or her training and experience, to suspect animal cruelty, abuse, or neglect.

(4) “Owner” means any person who is the legal owner, keeper, harborer, possessor, or the actual custodian of an animal. “Owner” includes corporations as well as individuals.

(e) Reports made pursuant to this section may be made on a preprinted form prepared by the entity or entities that
 investigate reports of animal cruelty, abuse, and neglect in that county that includes the definitions contained in subdivision (d), and a space for the reporter to include each of the following:

(1) His or her name and title.

(2) His or her business address and telephone number.

(3) The name, if known, of the animal owner or custodian.

(4) The location of the animal and the premises on which the known or reasonably suspected animal cruelty, abuse, or neglect took place.

(5) A description of the location of the animal and the premises.

(6) Type and numbers of animals involved.

(7) A description of the animal and its condition.

(8) The date, time, and a description of the observation or incident which led the reporter to suspect animal cruelty, abuse, or neglect and any other information the reporter believes may be relevant.

(f) When two or more employees of a county child or adult protective services agency are present and jointly have knowledge of known or reasonably suspected animal cruelty, abuse, or neglect, and where there is agreement among them, a report may be made by one person by mutual agreement. Any reporter who has knowledge that the person designated to report has failed to do so may thereafter make the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 236.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Reports of Metal Theft [11199.5. - 11199.5.]

11199.5.

Local law enforcement agencies are encouraged to report thefts of commodity metals, including, but not limited to, ferrous metal, copper, brass, aluminum, nickel, stainless steel, and alloys, that have occurred within their jurisdiction to the theft alert system maintained by the Institute of Scrap Recycling Industries, Inc., or its successor, in order to ensure that persons using that system receive timely and thorough information regarding metal thefts. The institute or its successor shall not sell subscribers’ information received
 pursuant to this section to third parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 608, Sec. 4.   (AB 2312)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Prevention and Abatement of Unlawful Activities [11200. - 11482.]



  ARTICLE 1. Unlawful Liquor Sale Abatement Law [11200. - 11207.]

11200.

Every building or place used for the purpose of unlawfully selling, serving or giving away any spirituous, vinous, malt or other alcoholic liquor, and every building or place in or upon which such liquors are unlawfully sold, served or given away, is a nuisance which shall be enjoined, abated and prevented, whether it is a public or private nuisance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11201.

Whenever there is reason to believe that a nuisance as defined in this article is kept, maintained or exists in any county, the district attorney, in the name of the people of the State of California, shall, or the city attorney of an incorporated city, or any citizen of the state resident within the county, in his or her own name may, maintain an action in equity to abate and prevent the nuisance and to perpetually enjoin the person or persons conducting or maintaining it, and the owner, lessee or agent of the building, or place, in or upon which the nuisance exists, from directly or indirectly maintaining or permitting it.

The complaint in the action shall be verified unless filed by the district attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1076, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

11202.

Whenever the existence of a nuisance is shown in an action brought under this article to the satisfaction of the court or judge thereof, either by verified complaint or affidavit, and the court or judge is satisfied that the owner of the property has received written notice of the existence of the nuisance, signed by the complainant or the district attorney at least two weeks prior to the filing of the complaint, the court or judge shall allow a temporary writ of injunction to abate and prevent the continuance or recurrence of the nuisance. On granting such writ the court or judge shall require an undertaking on the part of the applicant to the effect that the applicant will pay to the party enjoined such damages, not exceeding an amount to be specified, as the opposing party may sustain by reason of the injunction, if the court finally decides that the applicant was not entitled to the injunction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 319.)
-------------------------------------------

11203.

Actions brought under this article shall have precedence over all other actions, excepting criminal proceedings, election contests and hearings on injunctions. If a complaint is filed under this article by a citizen, it shall not be dismissed by the plaintiff or for want of prosecution except upon a sworn statement made by the complainant and his attorney, setting forth the reasons why the action should be dismissed, and the dismissal ordered by the court. In case of failure to prosecute any such action with reasonable diligence, or at the request of the plaintiff, the court, in its discretion, may substitute any other citizen consenting thereto for the plaintiff. If the action is brought by a citizen and the court finds there was no reasonable ground or cause therefor, the costs shall be taxed against such citizen.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11204.

If the existence of a nuisance is established in an action as provided in this article, an order of abatement shall be entered as part of the judgment in the case, and plaintiff’s costs in such action are a lien upon the building and place, enforceable and collectible by execution issued by order of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11205.

Any violation or disobedience of an injunction or order expressly provided for in this article is punishable as a contempt of court by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than one nor more than six months, or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11206.

Whenever the owner of a building or place upon which an act or acts constituting a contempt as defined in this article has been committed is guilty of a contempt of court, and is fined therefor in any proceedings under this article, the fine is a lien upon such building and place to the extent of the interest of such person therein, enforceable and collectible by execution issued by order of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11207.

“Person,” as used in this article, means individuals, corporations, associations, partnerships, limited liability companies, trustees, lessees, agents and assignees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 199.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Red Light Abatement Law [11225. - 11235.]

11225.

(a) (1) Every building or place used for the purpose of illegal gambling as defined by state law or local ordinance, lewdness, assignation, or prostitution, and every building or place in or upon which acts of illegal gambling as defined by state law or local ordinance, lewdness, assignation, or prostitution, are held or occur, is a nuisance which shall be enjoined, abated, and prevented, and for which damages may be recovered, whether it is a public or private nuisance.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to apply the definition of a nuisance to a private residence where illegal gambling is conducted on
 an intermittent basis and without the purpose of producing profit for the owner or occupier of the premises.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, every building or place used for the purpose of human trafficking, and every building or place in or upon which acts of human trafficking are held or occur, is a nuisance which shall be enjoined, abated, and prevented, and for which damages may be recovered, whether it is a public or private nuisance.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, human trafficking is defined in Section 236.1.

(c) (1) Every building or place used as a bathhouse which as a primary activity encourages or permits conduct that according to the guidelines
 of the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention can transmit AIDS, including, but not limited to, anal intercourse, oral copulation, or vaginal intercourse, is a nuisance which shall be enjoined, abated, and prevented, and for which damages may be recovered, whether it is a public or private nuisance.

 (2) For purposes of this subdivision, a “bathhouse” means a business which, as its primary purpose, provides facilities for a spa, whirlpool, communal bath, sauna, steam bath, mineral bath, mud bath, or facilities for swimming.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 254, Sec. 2.   (AB 2212)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11226.

(a) If there is reason to believe that a nuisance, as defined in this article, is kept, maintained, or is in existence in any county, the district attorney or county counsel, in the name of the people of the State of California, or the city attorney of an incorporated city or any city and county may, or any citizen of the state resident within the county in their own name may, maintain an action in equity to abate and prevent the nuisance and to perpetually enjoin the person conducting or maintaining it, and the owner, lessee, or agent of the building or place, in or upon which the nuisance exists, from directly or indirectly maintaining or permitting it.

(b) The complaint in the action shall be verified unless filed by the district attorney, county counsel, or the
 city attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 495, Sec. 11.   (SB 1518)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11227.

(a) Whenever the existence of a nuisance is shown in an action brought under this article to the satisfaction of the court or judge thereof, either by verified complaint or affidavit, the court or judge shall allow a temporary restraining order or injunction to abate and prevent the continuance or recurrence of the nuisance.

(b) A temporary restraining order or injunction may enjoin subsequent owners, commercial lessees, or agents who acquire the building or place where the nuisance exists with notice of the order or injunction, specifying that the owner of the property subject to the temporary restraining order or injunction shall notify any prospective purchaser, commercial lessee, or other successor in interest of the existence of the order or injunction, and of its application to successors in interest, prior to entering into any agreement to sell or lease the property. The temporary restraining order or injunction shall not constitute a title defect, lien, or encumbrance on the real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1057, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11228.

Actions brought under this article have precedence over all actions, excepting criminal proceedings, election contests and hearings on injunctions, and in such actions evidence of the general reputation of a place is admissible for the purpose of proving the existence of a nuisance. If the complaint is filed by a citizen, it shall not be dismissed by the plaintiff or for want of prosecution except upon a sworn statement made by the complainant and his attorney, setting forth the reasons why the action should be dismissed, and the dismissal ordered by the court. In case of failure to prosecute any such action with reasonable diligence, or at the request of the plaintiff, the court, in its discretion, may substitute any other citizen consenting thereto for the plaintiff. If the action is brought by a citizen and the court finds there was no reasonable ground or cause therefor, the costs shall be taxed against such citizen.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11229.

Any violation or disobedience of an injunction or order expressly provided for by this article is punishable as a contempt of court by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than one nor more than six months, or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11230.

(a) (1) If the existence of a nuisance is established in an action as provided in this article, an order of abatement shall be entered as a part of the judgment in the case, directing the removal from the building or place of all fixtures, musical instruments and movable property used in conducting, maintaining, aiding, or abetting the nuisance, and directing the sale thereof in the manner provided for the sale of chattels under execution, and the effectual closing of the building or place against its use for any purpose, and that it be kept closed for a period of one year, unless sooner released. If the court finds that any vacancy resulting from closure of the building or place may create a
 nuisance or that closure is otherwise harmful to the community, in lieu of ordering the building or place closed, the court may order the person who is responsible for the existence of the nuisance to pay damages in an amount equal to the fair market rental value of the building or place for one year to the city or county in whose jurisdiction the nuisance is located. The actual amount of rent being received for the rental of the building or place, or the existence of any vacancy therein, may be considered, but shall not be the sole determinant of the fair market rental value. Expert testimony may be used to determine the fair market rental value.

(2) While the order remains in effect as to closing, the building or place is and shall remain in the custody of the court.

(3) For
 removing and selling the movable property, the officer is entitled to charge and receive the same fees as he or she would for levying upon and selling like property on execution.

(4) For closing the premises and keeping them closed, a reasonable sum shall be allowed by the court.

(b) The court may assess a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) against any and all of the defendants, based upon the severity of the nuisance and its duration.

(c) Except as otherwise specified by subdivision (d), one-half of the civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Restitution Fund in the State Treasury, the proceeds of which shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature
 to indemnify persons filing claims pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 13959) of Chapter 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and one-half of the civil penalties collected shall be paid to the city in which the judgment was entered, if the action was brought by the city attorney or city prosecutor. If the action was brought by a district attorney, one-half of the civil penalties collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(d) In cases involving human trafficking, one-half of the civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Victim-Witness Assistance Fund to be available for appropriation by the Legislature to the California Emergency Management Agency to fund grants for human trafficking victim services and prevention programs provided by
 community-based organizations. The community-based organizations shall have trained human trafficking caseworkers, as defined by Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code. The other one-half of the civil penalties shall be paid to the city in which judgment was entered, if the action was brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor. If the action was brought by a district attorney, the one-half of the civil penalty shall, instead, be paid to the treasurer of the county in which judgment was entered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 254, Sec. 3.   (AB 2212)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11231.

The proceeds of the sale of the property, as provided in Section 11230, shall be applied as follows:

1. To the fees and costs of removal and sale;

2. To the allowances and costs of closing and keeping closed the building or place;

3. To the payment of plaintiff’s costs in the action;

4. The balance, if any, shall be paid to the owner of the property so sold.

If the proceeds of the sale do not fully discharge all such costs, fees and allowances, the building and place shall also be sold under execution issued upon the order of the court or judge and the proceeds of such sale applied in like manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11232.

If the owner of the building or place is not guilty of any contempt of court in the proceedings, and appears and pays all costs, fees and allowances which are a lien on the building or place and files a bond in the full value of the property, to be ascertained by the court, conditioned that the owner will immediately abate any nuisance that may exist at the building or place and prevent the nuisance from being established or kept thereat within a period of one year thereafter, the court, or judge thereof, may, if satisfied of the owner’s good faith, order the premises closed under the order of abatement, to be delivered to the owner, and the order of abatement canceled so far as the order relates to the property. The release of the property under the provisions of this section does not release it from any judgment, lien, penalty or liability to which it may be subject by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 320.)
-------------------------------------------

11233.

Whenever the owner of a building or place upon which an act or acts constituting a contempt as defined in this article has been committed, is guilty of a contempt of court and fined therefor under this article, the fine shall be a lien upon the building and place to the extent of the interest of such person therein, enforceable and collectible by execution issued by the order of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11234.

“Person” as used in this article means individuals, corporations, associations, partnerships, limited liability companies, trustees, lessees, agents and assignees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 200.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11235.

“Building” as used in this article means so much of any building or structure of any kind as is or may be entered through the same outside entrance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Control of Gambling Ships [11300. - 11319.]

11300.

It is unlawful for any person, within this State, to solicit, entice, induce, persuade or procure, or to aid in soliciting, enticing, inducing, persuading or procuring any person to visit any gambling ship, whether such gambling ship be within or without the jurisdiction of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11301.

As used in this article “craft” includes every boat, ship, vessel, craft, barge, hulk, float or other thing capable of floating.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11302.

It is unlawful for any person, within this State, to solicit, entice, induce, persuade or procure, or to aid in soliciting, enticing, inducing, persuading or procuring any person to visit any craft, whether such craft is within or without the jurisdiction of the State, from which craft any person is transported, conveyed or carried to any gambling ship, whether such gambling ship is within or without the jurisdiction of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11303.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, association or corporation to transport, convey or carry, or to aid in transporting, conveying or carrying any person to any gambling ship, whether such gambling ship is within or without the jurisdiction of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11304.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, association or corporation to transport, convey or carry, or to aid in transporting, conveying or carrying any person to any craft, whether such craft is within or without the jurisdiction of the State, from which craft any person is transported, conveyed, or carried to any gambling ship, whether such gambling ship is within or without the jurisdiction of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11305.

Any boat, ship, vessel, watercraft, barge, airplane, seaplane or aircraft, hereinafter called “means of conveyance,” used for the purpose of transporting, conveying or carrying persons in violation of this article is a public nuisance which shall be enjoined, abated and prevented.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11306.

Whenever there is reason to believe that a nuisance as defined in this article is kept, maintained or exists in any county, the district attorney, in the name of the people, shall, or any citizen of the State resident in the county, in his own name, may, maintain an action to abate and prevent the nuisance and perpetually to enjoin the person or persons conducting or maintaining it, whether as principal, agent, servant, employee or otherwise, from directly or indirectly maintaining or permitting the nuisance.

Unless filed by the district attorney, the complaint in the action shall be verified.

In any such action the plaintiff, at the time of issuing the summons, or at any time afterward, may have the means of conveyance, with its tackle, apparel and furniture, seized and kept as security for the satisfaction of any judgment that may be entered in the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11307.

When any means of conveyance is seized pursuant to Section 11306, the owner thereof or any other person otherwise entitled to possession thereof may apply to the court in which the action is pending for leave to file bond and regain possession of the means of conveyance during the pendency of the proceedings. The bond shall be in an amount determined by the judge to be the actual value of the means of conveyance at the time of its release. Upon giving said bond conditioned upon compliance with the terms of any temporary writ of injunction entered in the action and upon the return of the means of conveyance to the custody of the court in the event the same is ordered forfeited, the person on whose behalf such bond is given shall be put in possession of said means of conveyance and may use it until it is finally ordered delivered up and forfeited, if such be the judgment of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11308.

If the existence of a nuisance as defined in this article is shown in any action brought under this article to the satisfaction of the court or judge, either by verified complaint or affidavit, the court or judge shall allow a temporary writ of injunction to abate and prevent the continuance or recurrence of the nuisance. On granting the temporary writ the court or judge shall require an undertaking on the part of the applicant to the effect that the applicant will pay to the defendant enjoined such damages, not exceeding an amount to be specified, as the defendant sustains by reason of the injunction if the court finally decides that the applicant was not entitled to it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 321.)
-------------------------------------------

11309.

Actions brought under this article shall have precedence over all other actions, except criminal proceedings, election contests and hearings on injunctions.

If the complaint is filed by a citizen it shall not be dismissed by him or for want of prosecution except upon a sworn statement made by him and his attorney, setting forth the reasons why the action should be dismissed, and by dismissal ordered by the court.

In case of failure to prosecute the action with reasonable diligence, or at the request of the plaintiff, the court, in its discretion, may substitute any other citizen consenting thereto for the plaintiff.

If the action is brought by a citizen and the court finds there was no reasonable ground or cause therefor, the costs shall be taxed against him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11310.

If the existence of a nuisance as defined in this article is established in an action brought thereunder, an order of abatement shall be entered as part of the judgment in the case, and plaintiff’s costs in the action are a lien upon the means of conveyance, and upon its tackle, apparel and furniture. The lien is enforceable and collectible by execution issued by order of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11311.

A violation or disobedience of an injunction or order for abatement provided for in this article is punishable as a contempt of court by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than one nor more than six months, or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11312.

If the existence of a nuisance as defined in this article is established in an action brought thereunder, an order of abatement shall be entered as a part of the judgment, which order shall direct the seizure and forfeiture of the means of conveyance with its tackle, apparel and furniture, and the sale thereof in the manner provided for the sale of like chattels under execution.

While the order of abatement remains in effect, the means of conveyance is in the custody of the court.

For seizing and selling the means of conveyance, the officer is entitled to charge and receive the same fees as he would for levying upon and selling like property on execution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11313.

The proceeds of the sale of the means of conveyance shall be applied as follows:

First—To the fees and costs of the seizure and sale.

Second—To the payment of the plaintiff’s costs in the action.

Third—The balance, if any, shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11314.

If the owner of the means of conveyance has not been guilty of any contempt of court in a proceeding brought under this article, and appears and pays all costs, fees, and allowances that are a lien on the means of conveyance and files a bond in the full value of the means of conveyance, to be ascertained by the court, conditioned that the owner will immediately abate the nuisance and prevent it from being established or resumed within a period of one year thereafter, the court or judge may, if satisfied of the owner’s good faith, order the means of conveyance to be delivered to the owner, and the order of abatement canceled so far as it may relate thereto. The release of such means of conveyance under the provisions of this section does not release it from any judgment, lien, penalty, or liability to which it may be subject.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 322.)
-------------------------------------------

11315.

Whenever the owner of the means of conveyance, or the owner of any interest therein, has been guilty of a contempt of court, and fined in any proceeding under this article, the fine is a lien upon the property to the extent of his interest in it. The lien is enforceable and collectible by execution issued by order of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11316.

Any person, firm, association or corporation, either as principal, agent, servant, employee or otherwise, who violates any of the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11317.

The term “gambling ship” as used in this article means any boat, ship, vessel, watercraft or barge kept, operated or maintained for the purpose of gambling, whether within or without the jurisdiction of the State, and whether it is anchored, lying to, or navigating.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11318.

If any section, subsection, paragraph, sentence or clause of this article is for any reason held to be invalid, the Legislature hereby declares that had it known of the invalidity of that portion at the time of this enactment, it would have passed the remainder of the article without the invalid portion and that it is the intention of the Legislature that the remainder of the article operate in the event of the invalidity of any portion thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

11319.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Violate any provision of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 319), Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 330), or Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 337.1) of Title 9 of Part 1 on a craft that embarks from any point within the state, and disembarks at the same or another point within the state, during which time the person intentionally causes or knowingly permits gambling activity to be conducted, whether within or without the waters of the state.

(b) Manage, supervise, control, operate, or own any craft that embarks from any point within the state, and disembarks at the same or another point within the state, during which time the person intentionally causes or knowingly permits gambling activity which would violate any provision of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 319), Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 330), or Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 337.1) of Title 9 of Part 1 to be conducted, whether within or without the waters of the state.

(c) This section shall not apply to gambling activity conducted on United States-flagged or foreign-flagged craft during travel from a foreign nation or another state or possession of the United States up to the point of first entry into California waters or during travel to a foreign nation or another state or possession of the United States from the point of departure from California waters, provided that nothing herein shall preclude prosecution for any other offense under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 276, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Terrorizing [11410. - 11414.]

11410.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is the right of every person regardless of actual or perceived disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, nationality, race or ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, or association with a person or group with these actual or perceived characteristics, to be secure and protected from fear, intimidation, and physical harm caused by the activities of violent groups and individuals. It is not the intent of this chapter to interfere with the exercise of rights protected by the Constitution of the United States. The Legislature recognizes the constitutional right of every citizen to harbor and express beliefs on any subject whatsoever and to associate with others who share similar beliefs.
 The Legislature further finds however, that the advocacy of unlawful violent acts by groups against other persons or groups under circumstances where death or great bodily injury is likely to result is not constitutionally protected, poses a threat to public order and safety, and should be subject to criminal and civil sanctions.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Association with a person or group with these actual or perceived characteristics” includes advocacy for, identification with, or being on the ground owned or rented by, or adjacent to, any of the following: a community center, educational facility, family, individual, office, meeting hall, place of worship, private institution, public agency, library, or other entity, group, or person that has, or is identified with people who have, one or more of those characteristics listed
 in the definition of “hate crime” under paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 422.55.

(2) “Disability” includes mental disability and physical disability as defined in Section 12926 of the Government Code.

(3) “Gender” means sex, and includes a person’s gender identity and gender expression. “Gender expression” means a person’s gender-related appearance and behavior whether or not stereotypically associated with the person’s assigned sex at birth.

(4) “Nationality” includes citizenship, country of origin, and national origin.

(5) “Race or ethnicity” includes ancestry, color, and ethnic background.

(6) “Religion” includes all aspects of religious belief, observance, and practice and includes agnosticism and atheism.

(7) “Sexual orientation” means heterosexuality, homosexuality, or bisexuality.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 719, Sec. 34.   (AB 887)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11411.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to criminalize the placement or display of the Nazi Hakenkreuz (hooked cross), also known as the Nazi swastika that was the official emblem of the Nazi party, for the purpose of terrorizing a person. This legislation is not intended to criminalize the placement or display of the ancient swastika symbols that are associated with Hinduism, Buddhism, and Jainism and are symbols of peace.

(b) A person who hangs a noose, knowing it to be a symbol representing a threat to life, on the private property of another, without authorization, for the purpose of terrorizing the owner or occupant of that private property or in reckless disregard of the risk of terrorizing the owner or occupant of that private property, or who hangs a noose, knowing it to be a symbol representing a threat to life, on the property of a school, college campus, public
 place, place of worship, cemetery, or place of employment, for the purpose of terrorizing a person who attends, works at, or is otherwise associated with the school, college campus, public place, place of worship, cemetery, or place of employment, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months or two or three years, by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment, or in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment for the first conviction.

(c) A person who places or displays a sign, mark, symbol, emblem, or other physical impression, including, but not limited to, a Nazi swastika, on the private property of another, without authorization, for the purpose of terrorizing the owner or occupant of that private property or in reckless disregard of the risk of terrorizing the owner or occupant of that private property, or who places or displays a sign, mark, symbol, emblem, or other physical impression, including, but not limited to, a Nazi swastika, on the property of a school, college campus, public place, place of worship, cemetery, or place of employment, for the purpose of terrorizing a person who attends, works at, or is otherwise associated with the school, college campus, public place, place of worship, cemetery, or place of employment, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section
 1170 for 16 months or two or three years, by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment, or in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed
 five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment for the first conviction.

(d) A person who burns or desecrates a cross or other religious symbol, knowing it to be a religious symbol, on the private property of another without authorization for the purpose of terrorizing the owner or occupant of that private property or in reckless disregard of the risk of terrorizing the owner or occupant of that private property, or who burns, desecrates, or destroys a cross or other religious symbol, knowing it to be a religious symbol, on the property of a school, college